Rhode Island, session 2025, SB666.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-30 of the General Laws entitled "Personal Income Tax" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-30-28. Tax credit for alternative fuel motor vehicle conversion.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an individual is allowed a tax
credit against taxes imposed by § 44-30-2.6 for equipment and labor costs incurred to convert a
motor vehicle licensed in Rhode Island to operate on alternative fuel.
(2) A seller of alternative fuel may not receive a credit for converting its own vehicles to
the alternative fuel that it sells.
(b) The maximum credit a taxpayer may claim in a year under this section is an amount
equal to fifty percent (50%) of the equipment and labor costs incurred but the credit may not exceed:
(1) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) for conversion of a motor vehicle with a gross weight
of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less; or
(2) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for conversion of a motor vehicle with a gross vehicle
weight over ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.).
(c) For purposes of this section, "alternative fuel" means:
(1) Natural gas;
(2) Liquified petroleum gas;
(3) Liquified natural gas;
(4) Hydrogen;

(5) Cooking oil;
(6) Electricity; or
(7) Any other fuel if at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the fuel is methanol, ethanol or
other alcohol, ether, or any combination thereof.
(d)(1) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the taxpayer's income tax
liability.
(2) There is no carryback or carryforward of the credit permitted under this section, and
the credit must be applied in the year the conversion is made, as determined by the taxpayer's
accounting method.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect for the tax year beginning January 1, 2026.
========
LC001695
========
LC001695 - Page 2 of 3